apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="numeros"><!--TODO: numbers are to be done-->
<!--      <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e> -->
      <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)*[., ]*</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9][0-9].</re><p><l>-/</l><r>\</r></p><re>[0-9][0-9].</re><p><l>-/</l><r>\</r></p><re>[0-9][0-9][0-9][0-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>г.</l> <r><b/>г.<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l><b/>godina</l> <r><b/>godina<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Roman numerals--><!--TODO: all of 'em, this is just to cover up to ten-->
      <e><i>i</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>ii</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>iii</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>iv</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>v</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>vi</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>vii</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>viii</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>ix</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>x</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>

      <e><i>I</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>II</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>III</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>IV</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>V</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>VI</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>VII</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>VIII</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>IX</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>
      <e><i>X</i><par n="numeros_romanos"/></e>

      <!--Collective numerals-->
      <e><i>četv</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>pet</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>šest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>sedm</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>osm</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>devet</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>deset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>trideset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>četrdeset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>pedeset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>šezdeset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>sedamdeset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>osamdeset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>devedeset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><p><l>dvoje</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dvojih</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dvojim</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dvojima</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dvoje</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dvoje</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dvojim</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dvojim</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dvojim</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dvojima</l><r>dvoje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>troje</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>trojih</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>trojim</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>trojima</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>troje</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>troje</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>trojim</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>trojim</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>trojim</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>trojima</l><r>troje<s n="num"/><s n="coll"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--end Collective numerals-->      

      <e><i>dva</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>tri</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>tri</i><par n="numeros_con_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>četiri</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>četiri</i><par n="numeros_con_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>pet</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>šest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>sedam</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>osam</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>devet</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>deset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>jedanaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>dvanaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>trinaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>četrnaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>petnaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>šesnaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>sedamnaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>osamnaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>devetnaest</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>

      <e><i>dvadeset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>trideset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>četrdeset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>pedeset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>šezdeset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>sedamdeset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>osamdeset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>devedeset</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>
      <e><i>sto</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>

      <e><i>dvadeset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>trideset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>četrdeset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>pedeset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>šezdeset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>sedamdeset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>osamdeset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>devedeset<b/>i<b/></i><par n="base_numerals"/></e>

      <!--TODO: add a paradigm for these collectives-->
      <e><i>dvoje</i><par n="numeros_sin_inflexion"/></e>

      <e><i>jedanaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>dvanaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>trinaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>četrnaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>petnaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>šesnaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>sedamnaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>osamnaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>devetnaest</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>
      <e><i>dvadeset</i><par n="collective_numerals"/></e>

<!--      <e><p><l>jedan</l><r>jedan<s n="num"/></r></p></e> -->
      <e><p><l>jedan</l><r>jedan<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jednog</l><r>jedan<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jednoga</l><r>jedan<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jednog</l><r>jedan<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jednoga</l><r>jedan<s n="num"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
